ru: Вид замаха: Компактный ход; Длинный ход; Средний ход; Другое
zh-TW: 揮桿樣式: 緊湊行程; 長行程; 中等行程; 其他
nb: Svingstil: Kompakte slag; Lange slag; Moderate slag; Annet
ko: 스윙 스타일: 컴팩트 스트로크; 롱 스트로크; 모더레이트 스트로크; 기타
es: Estilo de swing: Trayectorias compactas; Trayectorias largas; Trayectorias moderadas; Otros
pt-PT: Estilo de balanço: Golpes compactos; Golpes longos; Goles moderados; Outro
sk-SK: Štýl švihu: Kompaktné ťahy; Dlhé ťahy; Mierne ťahy; Iné
ro-RO: Tipul de balansare: Curse compacte; Curse lungi; Curse moderate; Altele
da: Gyngestil: Kompakte strøg; Lange strøg; Moderate strøg; Andet
cs: Styl švihu: Kompaktní tahy; Dlouhé tahy; Mírné tahy; Jiné
ja: スイングスタイル: コンパクトストローク; ロングストローク; モデレートストローク; その他
fr: Style de basculement: Coups compacts; Coups longs; Coups modérés; Autre
vi: Kiểu bơi: Phát ngắn; Phát dài; Phát vừa; Khác
pt-BR: Estilo em movimento: Golpes compactos; Golpes longos; Golpes moderados; Outro
pl: Styl huśtawki: Kompaktowe skoki; Długie skoki; Umiarkowane skoki; Inne
fi: Heiluntatyyli: Kompaktit vedot; Pitkät vedot; Kohtalaiset vedot; Muu
sv: Svingstil: Kompakta slag; Långa slag; Måttliga slag; Övrigt
nl: Schommelstijl: Compacte slagen; Lange slagen; Middellange slagen; Andere
zh-CN: 挥杆款式: 短冲程; 长冲程; 中冲程; 其他
tr: Salıncak Stili: Kompakt vuruşlar; Uzun vuruşlar; Orta vuruşlar; Diğer
th: สไตล์สวิง: สโตรกคอมแพค; สโตรกยาว; สโตรกปานกลาง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Način zamaha: Kompaktni potezi; Dugi potezi; Umjereni potezi; Ostalo
sl-SI: Slog zamaha: Kompakten udarec; Dolgi udarec; Zmeren udarec; Drugo
lt-LT: Smūgio stilius: Trumpi smūgiai; Ilgi smūgiai; Vidutiniai smūgiai; Kita
hu: Lendítés stílusa: Kompakt ütések; Hosszú ütések; Mérsékelt ütések; Egyéb
it: Stile dello swing: Corse compatte; Corse lunghe; Corse moderate; Altro
de: Schwungstil: Kompakte Schläge; Lange Schläge; Moderate Schläge; Sonstiges
en: Swing style: Compact strokes; Long strokes; Moderate strokes; Other
bg-BG: Стил на удар: Компактни удари; Дълги удари; Умерени удари; Други
el: Στυλ αιώρησης: Συμπαγείς πινελιές; Μακριά εγκεφαλικά επεισόδια; Μέτρια εγκεφαλικά επεισόδια; Άλλο